District of Columbia statutes.
4-1704.04

LRAP; award of loans.

(a)

The Administrator shall award loans to participants during the period of service obligation in accordance with § 4-1704.06. Subject to the availability of funds and within the limits established by subsection (c) of this section, participants shall be granted loans sufficient to repay all eligible debt.

(b)

If the needs of all participants exceed the financing available in any fiscal year, preference shall be given to participants who:

(1)

Are graduates of accredited public schools of law in the District of Columbia;

(2)

Have completed no less than 2 prior service obligations in the LRAP;

(3)

Have graduated from an accredited school of law within the last 3 years; or

(4)

Have a high debt to adjusted gross income ratio as compared to other participants.

(c)

Participants in the LRAP shall not receive loan repayment assistance under the LRAP in excess of $60,000, or in excess of $1,000 for a single month; except, that the Deputy Mayor may by rulemaking increase the award limits in this subsection to reflect changes in reasonable education expenses.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 404
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226

History